Utah statutes.
53A-24-107.   Personally identifiable information -- Nondisclosure -- Penalty.

(1)  Personally identifiable information obtained by the office, its employees, or agents concerning individuals applying for or receiving services under this chapter may not be disclosed without the prior written consent of the individual or the individual's legal representative, except as required for administration of programs or services under this chapter, or as otherwise authorized by law.

(2)  Unauthorized disclosure of personally identifiable information obtained under this chapter, or use of such information for unauthorized purposes, is a misdemeanor.

